Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.090

Misappropriation, etc., by treasurer.

Every state, county, city, or town treasurer who willfully misappropriates any moneys, funds, or securities received by or deposited with him or her as such treasurer, or who shall be guilty of any other malfeasance or willful neglect of duty in his or her office, is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

[ 2003 c 53 s 220; 1992 c 7 s 38; 1909 c 249 s 319; RRS s 2571.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

County treasurer, suspension for misconduct: RCW 36.29.090.

State treasurer, embezzlement: RCW 43.08.140.